browser/locales/l10n/lv/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lv_LV.aff
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 t  ts/WYX   t

SFX 6 Y 96
SFX 6 is uša     [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušam    [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušu     [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušā     [^cz]is
SFX 6 is usi     [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušas    [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušai    [^cz]is
SFX 6 is uši     [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušiem   [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušus    [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušos    [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušām    [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušās    [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušais   [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušajam  [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušo     [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušajā   [^cz]is
SFX 6 is usī     [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušajai  [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušie    [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušajiem [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušajos  [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušajām  [^cz]is
SFX 6 is ušajās  [^cz]is
SFX 6 cis kuša     [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušam    [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušu     [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušā     [c]is
SFX 6 cis kusi     [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušas    [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušai    [c]is
SFX 6 cis kuši     [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušiem   [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušus    [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušos    [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušām    [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušās    [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušais   [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušajam  [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušo     [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušajā   [c]is
SFX 6 cis kusī     [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušajai  [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušie    [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušajiem [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušajos  [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušajām  [c]is
SFX 6 cis kušajās  [c]is
SFX 6 dzis guša     [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušam    [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušu     [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušā     [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gusi     [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušas    [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušai    [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis guši     [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušiem   [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušus    [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušos    [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušām    [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušās    [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušais   [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušajam  [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušo     [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušajā   [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gusī     [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušajai  [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušie    [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušajiem [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušajos  [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušajām  [d]zis
SFX 6 dzis gušajās  [d]zis
SFX 6 is uša     [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušam    [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušu     [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušā     [^d]zis
SFX 6 is usi     [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušas    [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušai    [^d]zis
SFX 6 is uši     [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušiem   [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušus    [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušos    [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušām    [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušās    [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušais   [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušajam  [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušo     [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušajā   [^d]zis
SFX 6 is usī     [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušajai  [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušie    [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušajiem [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušajos  [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušajām  [^d]zis
SFX 6 is ušajās  [^d]zis

SFX 7 Y 6
SFX 7 t  is/6   [^āeēīūkos]t
SFX 7 t  is/6   [^a]st
SFX 7 kt cis/6   [k]t
SFX 7 st dis/6   [a]st
SFX 7 t  jis/6   [āēīoū]t
SFX 7 iet  gājis/6   iet


SFX 8 Y 48
SFX 8 aut āvis/6  aut
SFX 8 kt  cis/6   kt
SFX 8 gt  dzis/6  gt
SFX 8 emt ēmis/6  emt
SFX 8 umt ūmis/6  umt
SFX 8 elt ēlis/6  elt
SFX 8 ilt īlis/6  ilt
SFX 8 ult ūlis/6  ult
SFX 8 ūt  uvis/6  [^b]ūt
SFX 8 ūt  ijis/6   [b]ūt
SFX 8 art āris/6  art
SFX 8 urt ūris/6  urt
SFX 8 irt iris/6  irt
SFX 8 ert ēris/6  ert
SFX 8 ot  evis/6  ot
SFX 8 iet ējis/6  iet
SFX 8 īt  inis/6  [^rvlķptm]īt
SFX 8 īt  ijis/6   [vlrm]īt
SFX 8 st  dis/6  [^aeiīuūlrm]st
SFX 8 st  dis/6  [^p][r]ast
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [p]rast
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [c]iest
SFX 8 st  dis/6   [^a]lst
SFX 8 st  tis/6    [a]lst
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [lm]est
SFX 8 st  dis/6  [^c][^lm]est
SFX 8 st  dis/6    [v]est
SFX 8 st  tis/6  [^aģr]ist
SFX 8 st  dis/6     [ģ]ist
SFX 8 st  dis/6   [^k]rist
SFX 8 st  tis/6    [k]rist
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [^l]aist
SFX 8 st  dis/6    [l]aist
SFX 8 st  dis/6    [^v]īst
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [^s]vīst
SFX 8 st  dis/6    [s]vīst
SFX 8 st  dis/6 [^ajsš]ust
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [jsš]ust
SFX 8 st  dis/6   [^j]aust
SFX 8 st  tis/6    [j]aust
SFX 8 st  dis/6    [^p]ūst
SFX 8 st  tis/6     [p]ūst
SFX 8 st  dis/6  [^āēi]rst
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [āi]rst
SFX 8 st  dis/6  [^v]ērst
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [v]ērst
SFX 8 st  dis/6  [^i]mst
SFX 8 st  tis/6   [i]mst

SFX ^ Y 6
SFX ^ īt  inis/6  [^z]īt
SFX ^ īt  ijis/6  [z]īt
SFX ^ īt  ijis/6  [m]īt
SFX ^ irt īris/6  irt
SFX ^ iet ejis/6  iet
SFX ^ st  tis/6   est

SFX & Y 20
SFX & t ies  [^āēīor]t  is:vvna
SFX & t ušās   [^āēīoūr]t  is:vvga
SFX & t ušos   [^āēīoūr]t  is:vvaa
SFX & t ušies  [^āēīoūr]t  is:dvna
SFX & t usies  [^āēīoūr]t  is:vsna
SFX & t jies    [āēīoū]t  is:vvna
SFX & t jušās   [āēīoū]t  is:vvga
SFX & t jušos   [āēīoū]t  is:vvaa
SFX & t jušies  [āēīoū]t  is:dvna
SFX & t jusies  [āēīoū]t  is:vsna
SFX & t ies    [^i]rt  is:vvna
SFX & t ušās   [^i]rt  is:vvga
SFX & t ušos   [^i]rt  is:vvaa
SFX & t ušies  [^i]rt  is:dvna
SFX & t usies  [^i]rt  is:vsna
SFX & irt īries    [i]rt  is:vvna
SFX & irt īrušās   [i]rt  is:vvga
SFX & irt īrušos   [i]rt  is:vvaa
SFX & irt īrušies  [i]rt  is:dvna
SFX & irt īrusies  [i]rt  is:vsna
